Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB155.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 21-5913 is hereby amended to read as follows: 21-
5913. (a) Obstructing apprehension or prosecution is knowingly harboring,
concealing or aiding any person who:
(1) Has committed or who has been charged with committing a
felony or misdemeanor under the laws of this state, other than a violation
of K.S.A. 22-4903, and amendments thereto, or another state or the United
States with intent that such person shall avoid or escape from arrest, trial,
conviction or punishment for such felony or misdemeanor; or
(2) is required to register under the Kansas offender registration act,
K.S.A. 22-4901 et seq., and amendments thereto, and who is not in
compliance with the requirements of such act with intent that such person
shall avoid or escape from registration, arrest, trial, conviction, punishment
or any criminal charges arising from the person's failure to comply with
the requirements of such act; or
(3) is alleged to have violated the terms and conditions of probation,
assignment to a community correctional services program, parole or
postrelease supervision, conditional release or a suspended sentence.
(b) Obstructing apprehension or prosecution as defined in:
(1) Subsection (a)(1) or (a)(3) is a:
(A) Severity level 8, nonperson felony if the person who is harbored,
concealed or aided has committed or has been charged with committing a
felony; and
(B) class C misdemeanor if the person who is aided has committed or
has been charged with committing a misdemeanor; and
(2) subsection (a)(2) is a severity level 5, person felony.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 21-5913 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.